Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1008
Utility; loans; restrictions.

A utility making a loan pursuant to section 66-1007 shall not:

(1) Operate an energy conservation plan for profit; or

(2) Supply or install energy conservation measures under its plan or own, either wholly or partially, any subsidiary involved in supplying or installing energy conservation measures under its plan.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 941, § 2.